Louisiana, session 2026, HB398.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:6 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§6. Maximum payment for meals or incidental expenses for certain agencies and
entities in the judicial branch
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no court
authorized by Article V of the Constitution of Louisiana or any state entity in the
judicial branch shall reimburse more for meals or incidental expenses for any officer
or employee than the maximum daily rates established by the United States General
Services Administration for such expenses. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit
reliance upon provisions for agency hosted conferences or meals during working
meetings that are equivalent to those that apply to executive branch employees
pursuant to R.S. 39:231.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 398 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 24:16 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§16. Maximum payment for meals or incidental expenses for the legislative branch
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no agency or
entity in the legislative branch shall reimburse more for meals or incidental expenses
for any officer or employee than the maximum daily rates established by the United
States General Services Administration for such expenses. Nothing in this Section
shall prohibit reliance upon provisions for agency hosted conferences or meals
during working meetings that are equivalent to those that apply to executive branch
employees pursuant to R.S. 39:231.
Section 3. R.S. 39:231(A) and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
39:231(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§231. Commissioner to prescribe rules governing travel and traveling expenses; use
of state aircraft and other vehicles by statewide elected officials; minimum
and maximum prices allowed for meals to state employees
A. Except as otherwise provided in Subsection B, Subsection C, and
Subsection D this Section, the commissioner of administration, with the approval of
the governor, shall, by rule or regulation, prescribe the conditions under which each
of various forms of transportation may be used by state officers and employees in the
discharge of the duties of their respective offices and positions in the state service
and the conditions under which allowances will be granted for traveling expenses.
* * *
C.(1) The commissioner of administration shall not establish meal
allowances for state employees at a price below two dollars and seventy-five cents
for breakfast, three dollars and twenty-five cents for lunch, and five dollars for
dinner.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no agency
or entity in the executive branch shall reimburse more for meals or incidental
expenses for any state officer or employee than the maximum daily rates established
by the United States General Services Administration for such expenses, unless
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 398 ENROLLED
authorized in writing by the commissioner of administration when acting in
accordance with an issued policy and procedure memorandum.
* * *
E.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, during
a state of disaster or emergency declared by the governor pursuant to R.S. 29:724,
the maximum allowable reimbursement for meals and incidental expenses for state
public officials and employees who are performing duties directly related to the
declared emergency or disaster may exceed the amounts established by the United
States General Services Administration by not more than seventy-five percent of the
applicable rate established by the United States General Services Administration for
the locality in which the expenses are incurred.
(2) The increased reimbursement rate authorized by Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection shall apply only to expenses incurred:
(a) Within the designated emergency area as identified in the governor's
executive order or proclamation, or in any area to which state personnel are deployed
in direct response to the declared emergency or disaster.
(b) During the period beginning on the date of the governor's declaration of
a state of disaster or emergency and ending on the date of the termination of the
declared state of disaster or emergency, or thirty days after the date of the
declaration, whichever occurs first. If the governor renews the declaration pursuant
to R.S. 29:724(B)(1), the increased reimbursement rate shall continue for the
duration of the renewed declaration.
(3) Each budget unit claiming reimbursement at the increased rate authorized
by this Subsection shall maintain documentation sufficient to demonstrate that the
expenses were incurred in direct connection with the declared emergency or disaster
and shall submit such documentation to the commissioner of administration within
sixty days after the termination of the declared state of disaster or emergency.
Section 4. This Act shall apply to expenses for meals and incidental expenses
incurred on and after July 1, 2026. Reimbursements for such expenses incurred prior to July
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 398 ENROLLED
1, 2026, but submitted after that date shall be at the rate in effect for the paying organization
at the time the expense was incurred.
Section 5. The provisions of this Act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.